Wisconsin, session 2025, AB678.
do enact as follows:AB678,13Section 1. 119.04 (1) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 42, is 4amended to read:AB678,2,141119.04 (1) Subchapters IV, V and VII of ch. 115, ch. 121 and ss. 66.0235 (3) (c), 266.0603 (1m) to (3), 115.01 (1) and (2), 115.28, 115.31, 115.33, 115.34, 115.343, 3115.345, 115.363, 115.364, 115.365 (3), 115.366, 115.367, 115.38 (2), 115.415, 4115.445, 118.001 to 118.04, 118.045, 118.06, 118.07, 118.075, 118.076, 118.10, 5118.12, 118.124, 118.125 to 118.14, 118.145 (4), 118.15, 118.153, 118.16, 118.162, 6118.163, 118.164, 118.18, 118.19, 118.196, 118.20, 118.223, 118.225, 118.24 (1), (2) 7(c) to (f), (6), (8), and (10), 118.245, 118.25, 118.255, 118.291, 118.292, 118.293, 8118.2935, 118.30 to 118.43, 118.46, 118.50, 118.51, 118.52, 118.53, 118.55, 118.56, 9118.58, 120.12 (2m), (4m), (5), (15) to (27), and (29), and (30), 120.125, 120.13 (1), (2) 10(b) to (g), (3), (14), (17) to (19), (26), (34), (35), (37), (37m), and (38), 120.137, 120.14, 11120.20, 120.21 (3), and 120.25 are applicable to a 1st class city school district and 12board but not, unless explicitly provided in this chapter or in the terms of a 13contract, to the commissioner or to any school transferred to an opportunity schools 14and partnership program.AB678,215Section 2. 120.12 (30) of the statutes is created to read:AB678,3,216120.12 (30) Communications between school district employees and 17pupils. By July 1, 2026, adopt a policy on appropriate communication between a 18school district employee or volunteer when acting in the individual’s official 19capacity and a pupil enrolled in the school district, attending a school that is not 20under the control of the school board, or attending a home-based private 21educational program. The school board shall include in the policy specific 22consequences for employees and volunteers who violate the policy. The school board 23shall specify that the policy under this subsection applies to communications that 1occur during or outside of school hours and shall include in the policy under this 2subsection standards for all of the following:AB678,3,33(a) Appropriate content.AB678,3,44(b) Appropriate methods of communication.AB678,3,55